New York, session 2025-2026, A6948.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 160-a to 2 read as follows: 3 § 160-a. Hours to constitute a week's work. 1. Unless otherwise 4 provided by law, for all employees, except those engaged in farm work 5 and those affected by subdivision four of section two hundred twenty of 6 this chapter, thirty-two hours shall constitute a legal week's work. 7 2. This section shall not prevent an agreement for overwork at an 8 increased compensation, except upon work by or for the state or a munic- 9 ipal corporation, or by contractors or subcontractors therewith, and 10 except as otherwise provided in this chapter. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10355-01-5